Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.320

Health support services.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5337-S2.SL) ***

(1) The assisted living facility licensee may choose to provide any of the following health support services, however, the facility may or may not need to provide additional health support services to comply with the reasonable accommodation requirements in federal or state law:

(a) Blood glucose testing;

(b) Puree diets;

(c) Calorie controlled diabetic diets;

(d) Dementia care;

(e) Mental health care; and

(f) Developmental disabilities care.

(2) The licensee shall clarify on the disclosure form any limitations, additional services, or conditions that may apply.

(3) In providing health support services, the assisted living facility shall observe the resident for changes in overall functioning and respond appropriately when there are observable or reported changes in the resident's physical, mental, or emotional functioning.

[ 2012 c 10 s 21; 2004 c 142 s 4.]

NOTES:

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.

Effective dates—2004 c 142: See note following RCW 18.20.020.